District of Columbia statutes.
47-1045

Prince Hall Freemason and Eastern Star Charitable Foundation, lot 0826 in square 0333.

Certain property located in the District of Columbia described as lot 0826 in square 0333 situated at 1000 “U” Street, N.W., together with improvements thereon and furnishings therein, with equitable and legal title in the name of the Prince Hall Freemason and Eastern Star Charitable Foundation, is hereby exempt from all taxation so long as the same is used in carrying on the purposes and activities of the Prince Hall Freemason and Eastern Star Charitable Foundation and is not used for exclusively commercial purposes, subject to the provisions of §§ 47-1005, 47-1007, and 47-1009.

Oct. 16, 1998, D.C. Law 12-172, § 2, 45 DCR 5195
1981 Ed., § 47-1045.